Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.580

Term papers, theses, dissertations, sale of prohibited—Legislative findings—Purpose.

(1) The legislature finds that commercial operations selling term papers, theses, and dissertations encourages academic dishonesty, and in so doing impairs the public confidence in the credibility of institutions of higher education whether in this state or any other to function within their prime mission, that of providing a quality education to the citizens of this or any other state.

(2) The legislature further finds that this problem, beyond the ability of these institutions to control effectively, is a matter of state concern, while at the same time recognizing the need for and the existence of legitimate research functions.

It is the declared intent of RCW 28B.10.580 through 28B.10.584, therefore, that the state of Washington prohibit the preparation for sale or commercial sale of term papers, theses and dissertations: PROVIDED, That such legislation shall not affect legitimate and proper research activities: PROVIDED FURTHER, That such legislation does not impinge on the rights, under the First Amendment, of freedom of speech, of the press, and of distributing information.

[ 1981 c 23 s 1; 1979 c 43 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 23: "If any provision of this amendatory act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1981 c 23 s 3.]

Severability—1979 c 43: "If any provision of this act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1979 c 43 s 4.]